Illinois, session 104th, HB3498.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 5Program Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 130/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. The following terms, as used in this 8Act, shall have the meanings set forth in this Section: 9    (a) "Adequate supply" means: 10        (1) 2.5 ounces of usable cannabis during a period of 11    14 days and that is derived solely from an intrastate 12    source. 13        (2) Subject to the rules of the Department of Public 14    Health, a patient may apply for a waiver where a 15    certifying health care professional provides a substantial 16    medical basis in a signed, written statement asserting 17    that, based on the patient's medical history, in the 18    certifying health care professional's professional 19    judgment, 2.5 ounces is an insufficient adequate supply 20    for a 14-day period to properly alleviate the patient's 21    debilitating medical condition or symptoms associated with 22    the debilitating medical condition. 23        (3) This subsection may not be construed to authorize   HB3498- 2 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1    the possession of more than 2.5 ounces at any time without 2    authority from the Department of Public Health. 3        (4) The pre-mixed weight of medical cannabis used in 4    making a cannabis infused product shall apply toward the 5    limit on the total amount of medical cannabis a registered 6    qualifying patient may possess at any one time.7    (a-5) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means a person 8who is licensed under the Nurse Practice Act as an advanced 9practice registered nurse and has a controlled substances 10license under Article III of the Illinois Controlled 11Substances Act. 12    (b) "Cannabis" has the meaning given that term in Section 133 of the Cannabis Control Act. 14    (c) "Cannabis plant monitoring system" means a system that 15includes, but is not limited to, testing and data collection 16established and maintained by the registered cultivation 17center and available to the Department for the purposes of 18documenting each cannabis plant and for monitoring plant 19development throughout the life cycle of a cannabis plant 20cultivated for the intended use by a qualifying patient from 21seed planting to final packaging. 22    (d) "Cardholder" means a qualifying patient or a 23designated caregiver who has been issued and possesses a valid 24registry identification card by the Department of Public 25Health. 26    (d-5) "Certifying health care professional" means a   HB3498- 3 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a 2physician assistant. 3    (e) "Cultivation center" means a facility operated by an 4organization or business that is registered by the Department 5of Agriculture to perform necessary activities to provide only 6registered medical cannabis dispensing organizations with 7usable medical cannabis. 8    (f) "Cultivation center agent" means a principal officer, 9board member, employee, or agent of a registered cultivation 10center who is 21 years of age or older and has not been 11convicted of an excluded offense. 12    (g) "Cultivation center agent identification card" means a 13document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 14identifies a person as a cultivation center agent. 15    (h) "Debilitating medical condition" means one or more of 16the following:17        (1) cancer, glaucoma, positive status for human 18    immunodeficiency virus, acquired immune deficiency 19    syndrome, hepatitis C, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, 20    Crohn's disease (including, but not limited to, ulcerative 21    colitis), agitation of Alzheimer's disease, 22    cachexia/wasting syndrome, muscular dystrophy, severe 23    fibromyalgia, spinal cord disease, including but not 24    limited to arachnoiditis, Tarlov cysts, hydromyelia, 25    syringomyelia, Rheumatoid arthritis, fibrous dysplasia, 26    spinal cord injury, traumatic brain injury and   HB3498- 4 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1    post-concussion syndrome, Multiple Sclerosis, 2    Arnold-Chiari malformation and Syringomyelia, 3    Spinocerebellar Ataxia (SCA), Parkinson's, Tourette's, 4    Myoclonus, Dystonia, Reflex Sympathetic Dystrophy, RSD 5    (Complex Regional Pain Syndromes Type I), Causalgia, CRPS 6    (Complex Regional Pain Syndromes Type II), 7    Neurofibromatosis, Chronic Inflammatory Demyelinating 8    Polyneuropathy, Sjogren's syndrome, Lupus, Interstitial 9    Cystitis, Myasthenia Gravis, Hydrocephalus, nail-patella 10    syndrome, residual limb pain, seizures (including those 11    characteristic of epilepsy), post-traumatic stress 12    disorder (PTSD), autism, chronic pain, irritable bowel 13    syndrome, migraines, osteoarthritis, anorexia nervosa, 14    Ehlers-Danlos Syndrome, Neuro-Behcet's Autoimmune 15    Disease, neuropathy, polycystic kidney disease, superior 16    canal dehiscence syndrome, or the treatment of these 17    conditions; 18        (1.5) terminal illness with a diagnosis of 6 months or 19    less; if the terminal illness is not one of the qualifying 20    debilitating medical conditions, then the certifying 21    health care professional shall on the certification form 22    identify the cause of the terminal illness; or 23        (2) any other debilitating medical condition or its 24    treatment that is added by the Department of Public Health 25    by rule as provided in Section 45.26    (i) "Designated caregiver" means a person who: (1) is at   HB3498- 5 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1least 21 years of age; (2) has agreed to assist with a 2patient's medical use of cannabis; (3) has not been convicted 3of an excluded offense; and (3) (4) assists no more than 10 one 4registered qualifying patients patient with his or her medical 5use of cannabis. 6    (j) "Dispensing organization agent identification card" 7means a document issued by the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation that identifies a person as a medical 9cannabis dispensing organization agent. 10    (k) "Enclosed, locked facility" means a room, greenhouse, 11building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 12security devices that permit access only by a cultivation 13center's agents or a dispensing organization's agent working 14for the registered cultivation center or the registered 15dispensing organization to cultivate, store, and distribute 16cannabis for registered qualifying patients. 17    (l) "Excluded offense" for cultivation center agents and 18dispensing organizations means: 19        (1) a violent crime defined in Section 3 of the Rights 20    of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act or a substantially 21    similar offense that was classified as a felony in the 22    jurisdiction where the person was convicted; or 23        (2) a violation of a state or federal controlled 24    substance law, the Cannabis Control Act, or the 25    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act that 26    was classified as a felony in the jurisdiction where the   HB3498- 6 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1    person was convicted, except that the registering 2    Department may waive this restriction if the person 3    demonstrates to the registering Department's satisfaction 4    that his or her conviction was for the possession, 5    cultivation, transfer, or delivery of a reasonable amount 6    of cannabis intended for medical use. This exception does 7    not apply if the conviction was under state law and 8    involved a violation of an existing medical cannabis law. 9    For purposes of this subsection, the Department of Public 10Health shall determine by emergency rule within 30 days after 11the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 12Assembly what constitutes a "reasonable amount". 13    (l-5) (Blank).14    (l-10) "Illinois Cannabis Tracking System" means a 15web-based system established and maintained by the Department 16of Public Health that is available to the Department of 17Agriculture, the Department of Financial and Professional 18Regulation, the Illinois State Police, and registered medical 19cannabis dispensing organizations on a 24-hour basis to upload 20written certifications for Opioid Alternative Pilot Program 21participants, to verify Opioid Alternative Pilot Program 22participants, to verify Opioid Alternative Pilot Program 23participants' available cannabis allotment and assigned 24dispensary, and the tracking of the date of sale, amount, and 25price of medical cannabis purchased by an Opioid Alternative 26Pilot Program participant.  HB3498- 7 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1    (m) "Medical cannabis cultivation center registration" 2means a registration issued by the Department of Agriculture.3    (n) "Medical cannabis container" means a sealed, 4traceable, food compliant, tamper resistant, tamper evident 5container, or package used for the purpose of containment of 6medical cannabis from a cultivation center to a dispensing 7organization. 8    (o) "Medical cannabis dispensing organization", or 9"dispensing organization", or "dispensary organization" means 10a facility operated by an organization or business that is 11registered by the Department of Financial and Professional 12Regulation to acquire medical cannabis from a registered 13cultivation center for the purpose of dispensing cannabis, 14paraphernalia, or related supplies and educational materials 15to registered qualifying patients, individuals with a 16provisional registration for qualifying patient cardholder 17status, or an Opioid Alternative Pilot Program participant. 18    (p) "Medical cannabis dispensing organization agent" or 19"dispensing organization agent" means a principal officer, 20board member, employee, or agent of a registered medical 21cannabis dispensing organization who is 21 years of age or 22older and has not been convicted of an excluded offense. 23    (q) "Medical cannabis infused product" means food, oils, 24ointments, or other products containing usable cannabis that 25are not smoked. 26    (r) "Medical use" means the acquisition; administration;   HB3498- 8 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1delivery; possession; transfer; transportation; or use of 2cannabis to treat or alleviate a registered qualifying 3patient's debilitating medical condition or symptoms 4associated with the patient's debilitating medical condition. 5    (r-5) "Opioid" means a narcotic drug or substance that is 6a Schedule II controlled substance under paragraph (1), (2), 7(3), or (5) of subsection (b) or under subsection (c) of 8Section 206 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act. 9    (r-10) "Opioid Alternative Pilot Program participant" 10means an individual who has received a valid written 11certification to participate in the Opioid Alternative Pilot 12Program for a medical condition for which an opioid has been or 13could be prescribed by a certifying health care professional 14based on generally accepted standards of care. 15    (s) "Physician" means a doctor of medicine or doctor of 16osteopathy licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1987 to 17practice medicine and who has a controlled substances license 18under Article III of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act. 19It does not include a licensed practitioner under any other 20Act including but not limited to the Illinois Dental Practice 21Act. 22    (s-1) "Physician assistant" means a physician assistant 23licensed under the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987 24and who has a controlled substances license under Article III 25of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act. 26    (s-5) "Provisional registration" means a document issued   HB3498- 9 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1by the Department of Public Health to a qualifying patient who 2has submitted: (1) an online application and paid a fee to 3participate in Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program 4pending approval or denial of the patient's application; or 5(2) a completed application for terminal illness. 6    (t) "Qualifying patient" means a person who has been 7diagnosed by a certifying health care professional as having a 8debilitating medical condition. 9    (u) "Registered" means licensed, permitted, or otherwise 10certified by the Department of Agriculture, Department of 11Public Health, or Department of Financial and Professional 12Regulation. 13    (v) "Registry identification card" means a document issued 14by the Department of Public Health that identifies a person as 15a registered qualifying patient or registered designated 16caregiver. 17    (w) "Usable cannabis" means the seeds, leaves, buds, and 18flowers of the cannabis plant and any mixture or preparation 19thereof, but does not include the stalks, and roots of the 20plant. It does not include the weight of any non-cannabis 21ingredients combined with cannabis, such as ingredients added 22to prepare a topical administration, food, or drink. 23    (x) "Verification system" means a Web-based system 24established and maintained by the Department of Public Health 25that is available to the Department of Agriculture, the 26Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, law   HB3498- 10 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1enforcement personnel, and registered medical cannabis 2dispensing organization agents on a 24-hour basis for the 3verification of registry identification cards, the tracking of 4delivery of medical cannabis to medical cannabis dispensing 5organizations, and the tracking of the date of sale, amount, 6and price of medical cannabis purchased by a registered 7qualifying patient. 8    (y) "Written certification" means a document dated and 9signed by a certifying health care professional, stating (1) 10that the qualifying patient has a debilitating medical 11condition and specifying the debilitating medical condition 12the qualifying patient has; and (2) that (A) the certifying 13health care professional is treating or managing treatment of 14the patient's debilitating medical condition; or (B) an Opioid 15Alternative Pilot Program participant has a medical condition 16for which opioids have been or could be prescribed. A written 17certification shall be made only in the course of a bona fide 18health care professional-patient relationship, after the 19certifying health care professional has completed an 20assessment of either a qualifying patient's medical history or 21Opioid Alternative Pilot Program participant, reviewed 22relevant records related to the patient's debilitating 23condition, and conducted a physical examination.24    (z) "Bona fide health care professional-patient 25relationship" means a relationship established at a hospital, 26certifying health care professional's office, or other health   HB3498- 11 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1care facility in which the certifying health care professional 2has an ongoing responsibility for the assessment, care, and 3treatment of a patient's debilitating medical condition or a 4symptom of the patient's debilitating medical condition. 5    A veteran who has received treatment at a VA hospital 6shall be deemed to have a bona fide health care 7professional-patient relationship with a VA certifying health 8care professional if the patient has been seen for his or her 9debilitating medical condition at the VA Hospital in 10accordance with VA Hospital protocols.11    A bona fide health care professional-patient relationship 12under this subsection is a privileged communication within the 13meaning of Section 8-802 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 14(Source: P.A. 100-1114, eff. 8-28-18; 101-363, eff. 8-9-19.) 15    Section 10. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 16by changing Section 10-5 as follows: 17    (410 ILCS 705/10-5)18    Sec. 10-5. Personal use of cannabis; restrictions on 19cultivation; penalties. 20    (a) Beginning January 1, 2020, notwithstanding any other 21provision of law, and except as otherwise provided in this 22Act, the following acts are not a violation of this Act and 23shall not be a criminal or civil offense under State law or the 24ordinances of any unit of local government of this State or be   HB3498- 12 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under State law for 2persons other than natural individuals under 21 years of age:3        (1) possession, consumption, use, purchase, obtaining, 4    or transporting cannabis paraphernalia or an amount of 5    cannabis for personal use that does not exceed the 6    possession limit under Section 10-10 or otherwise in 7    accordance with the requirements of this Act;8        (2) cultivation of cannabis for personal use in 9    accordance with the requirements of this Act; and10        (3) controlling property if actions that are 11    authorized by this Act occur on the property in accordance 12    with this Act.13    (a-1) Beginning January 1, 2020, notwithstanding any other 14provision of law, and except as otherwise provided in this 15Act, possessing, consuming, using, purchasing, obtaining, or 16transporting cannabis paraphernalia or an amount of cannabis 17purchased or produced in accordance with this Act that does 18not exceed the possession limit under subsection (a) of 19Section 10-10 shall not be a basis for seizure or forfeiture of 20assets under State law.21    (b) Cultivating cannabis for personal use is subject to 22the following limitations:23        (1) An Illinois resident 21 years of age or older who 24    is a registered qualifying patient under the Compassionate 25    Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act may cultivate cannabis 26    plants, with a limit of 5 plants that are more than 5   HB3498- 13 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1    inches tall, per household without a cultivation center or 2    craft grower license. In this Section, "resident" means a 3    person who has been domiciled in the State of Illinois for 4    a period of 30 days before cultivation. 5        (2) Cannabis cultivation must take place in an 6    enclosed, locked space.7        (3) Adult registered qualifying patients may purchase 8    cannabis seeds from a dispensary for the purpose of home 9    cultivation. Seeds may not be given or sold to any other 10    person.11        (4) Cannabis plants shall not be stored or placed in a 12    location where they are subject to ordinary public view, 13    as defined in this Act. A registered qualifying patient 14    who cultivates cannabis under this Section shall take 15    reasonable precautions to ensure the plants are secure 16    from unauthorized access, including unauthorized access by 17    a person under 21 years of age.18        (5) Cannabis cultivation may occur only on residential 19    property lawfully in possession of the cultivator or with 20    the consent of the person in lawful possession of the 21    property. An owner or lessor of residential property may 22    prohibit the cultivation of cannabis by a lessee.23        (6) (Blank).24        (7) A dwelling, residence, apartment, condominium 25    unit, enclosed, locked space, or piece of property not 26    divided into multiple dwelling units shall not contain   HB3498- 14 -LRB104 09660 BDA 19726 b1    more than 12 5 plants at any one time.2        (8) Cannabis plants may only be tended by registered 3    qualifying patients who reside at the residence, or their 4    authorized agent attending to the residence for brief 5    periods, such as when the qualifying patient is 6    temporarily away from the residence.7        (9) A registered qualifying patient who cultivates 8    more than the allowable number of cannabis plants, or who 9    sells or gives away cannabis plants, cannabis, or 10    cannabis-infused products produced under this Section, is 11    liable for penalties as provided by law, including the 12    Cannabis Control Act, in addition to loss of home 13    cultivation privileges as established by rule. 14(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.)